Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 10 STATE DISASTER PREPAREDNESS ACT
§ 46-1020. Purpose and findings.

The legislature of the state of Idaho finds:

That recurring floods in Idaho threaten human life, health and property and that the public interest requires that the floodplains of Idaho be managed and regulated in order to minimize flood hazards to life, health and property.

That it is the policy of this state to reduce flood damage and the number of people and structures at risk in flood hazard areas through proper floodplain management, including such measures as floodplain zoning ordinances which require structures to be built at a flood protection elevation and/or with floodproofing.

That local units of government have the primary responsibility for planning, adoption and enforcement of land use regulations to accomplish this proper floodplain management. Furthermore, they are best able to adopt and implement comprehensive floodplain management programs that include nonregulatory techniques to accomplish the purposes of this act in cooperation with federal, state and local agencies.

The purpose of this act is:

To protect human life, health and property;

To preserve floodplains for the purpose of carrying and storing flood waters;

To reduce the public cost of providing emergency services, flood control structures and rebuilding public works damaged by floods;

To protect the tax base and jobs in Idaho;

To reduce the threat of increased damage to existing development;

To encourage the orderly development and wise use of floodplains;

To minimize interruptions to business;

To prevent increased flooding and erosion caused by improper development.

§ 46-1021. Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Development” means any man-made change to improved or unimproved real estate, including, but not limited to, the construction of buildings, structures or accessory structures, or the construction of additions or substantial improvements to buildings, structures or accessory structures; the placement of mobile homes; mining, dredging, filling, grading, paving, excavation or drilling operations; and the deposition or extraction of materials; specifically including the construction of dikes, berms and levees. The term “development” does not include the operation, cleaning, maintenance or repair of any ditch, canal, lateral, drain, diversion structure or other irrigation or drainage works that is performed or authorized by the owner thereof pursuant to lawful rights and obligations.

“Flood” means a general or temporary condition of partial or complete inundation of normally dry land areas caused by the overflow or rise of rivers, streams or lakes, or the unusual and rapid accumulation or runoff of surface waters from any source.

“Flood fringe” is that portion of the floodplain outside of the floodway covered by floodwaters during the regulatory flood.

“Floodplain” is the land that has been or may be covered by floodwaters, or is surrounded by floodwater and inaccessible, during the occurrence of the regulatory flood. The riverine floodplain includes the floodway and the flood fringe.

“Floodplain management” is the analysis and integration of the entire range of measures that can be used to prevent, reduce or mitigate flood damage in a given location, and that can protect and preserve the natural, environmental, historical, and cultural values of the floodplain.

“Floodproofing” means the modifications of structures, their sites, building contents and water and sanitary facilities, to keep water out or reduce the effects of water entry.

“Flood protection elevation” means an elevation that shall correspond to the elevation of the one percent (1%) chance flood (one hundred (100) year flood) plus any increased flood elevation due to floodway encroachment, plus any required freeboard.

“Floodway” is the channel of the river or stream and those portions of the floodplain adjoining the channel required to discharge and store the floodwater or flood flows associated with the regulatory flood.

“Freeboard” represents a factor of safety usually expressed in terms of a certain amount of feet above a calculated flood level. Freeboard shall compensate for the many unknown factors that contribute to flood heights greater than the height calculated. These unknown factors include, but are not limited to, ice jams, debris accumulation, wave action, obstruction of bridge openings and floodways, the effects of urbanization on the hydrology of the watershed, loss of flood storage areas due to development and the sedimentation of a river or stream bed.

“Local government,” in the context of this chapter, means any county or city having planning and zoning authority to regulate land use within its jurisdiction.

“Mitigation” means any action taken which will reduce the impact, damage or cost of the next flood that occurs.

“Person” means any individual, group of individuals, corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision, public or private agency or entity.
(13) “Regulatory flood” is a flood determined to be representative of large floods known to have occurred in Idaho and which may be expected to occur on a particular stream because of like physical characteristics. The regulatory flood is based upon a statistical analysis of stream flow records available for the watershed or an analysis of rainfall and runoff characteristics in the watershed. In inland areas, the flood frequency of the regulatory flood is once in every one hundred (100) years; this means that in any given year there is a one percent (1%) chance that a regulatory flood may occur or be exceeded.

§ 46-1022. Local governments may adopt floodplain zoning ordinances.

Subject to the availability of adequate mapping and data to properly identify the floodplains, if any, within its jurisdiction, each local government is encouraged to adopt a floodplain map and floodplain management ordinance which identifies these floodplains and which requires, at a minimum, that any development in a floodplain must be constructed at a flood protection elevation and/or have adequate floodproofing. The local government may regulate all mapped and unmapped floodplains within its jurisdiction. Nothing in this act shall prohibit a local government from adopting more restrictive standards than those contained in this chapter. Floodplain zoning ordinances shall not regulate the operation, cleaning, maintenance or repair of any ditch, canal, lateral, drain, diversion structure or other irrigation or drainage works that is performed or authorized by the owner thereof pursuant to lawful rights and obligations. If not otherwise exempt from approval, a flood control district’s conduct of a “flood fight,” as defined in section 42-3103, Idaho Code, shall not require prior local government approval provided all such approvals are obtained within a reasonable time after the imminent flooding event has ended.

§ 46-1023. Enforcement and sanctions.

Development constructed or maintained in violation of any local floodplain management ordinance that conforms to the provisions of this chapter is hereby declared to be a public nuisance and the creation thereof may be enjoined and the maintenance thereof may be abated by action of the state, any local unit of government of the state or any citizen thereof.

If, after the effective date of this chapter, a local government allows any development in a floodplain below the flood protection elevation without adequate floodproofing, that development shall not, in the event of a disaster emergency involving flooding in that floodplain, be eligible to receive any matching funds from the state for any federal disaster assistance program which may be available as a result of said flooding in that floodplain. The owner of the development will be required to rely on flood insurance to insure their property against the risk of loss incurred by their development in the floodplain in contravention of the intent of this chapter.

§ 46-1024. Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are severable.

§ 46-1025. Federal funds to political subdivisions.

Annually, the chief of the Idaho office of emergency management shall prepare a written summary of all grants received from the federal emergency management agency to be distributed to the forty-four (44) county commission chairmen. The summary shall list those federal funds that are eligible for direct assistance to local disaster agencies in accordance with section 46-1009(2), Idaho Code, and those funds that are limited to use by the state and not eligible for direct assistance to local disaster agencies.

Not less than thirty-four percent (34%) of the eligible direct assistance funds shall be subgranted by the Idaho office of emergency management to the local disaster agencies. Funds shall be distributed to the local disaster agencies subject to the provisions and rules of the Idaho office of emergency management, the federal emergency management agency through the Robert T. Stafford Act, title 44 of the code of federal regulations, and pertinent circulars published by the United States office of management and budget.

Direct financial assistance to the local disaster agencies is not an entitlement. Subgrants are awarded through the Idaho office of emergency management for the purpose of assisting counties to achieve goals and objectives outlined in an approved county grant proposal.

§ 46-1026. Definitions.

As used in this section and section 46-1027, Idaho Code, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Idaho technical rescue (ITR) teams” means a specialized team or group of teams formed pursuant to this section and section 46-1027, Idaho Code, organized with capabilities established under the federal emergency management agency national resource typing system in order to assist in the removal of trapped victims in emergency situations including, but not limited to, collapsed structures, confined spaces, trench excavations, elevated locations and other technical rescue situations.

“Specialty rescue team (SRT)” means a specialized team, formed pursuant to this section and section 46-1027, Idaho Code, organized to provide technical rescue assistance to supplement and work under first responders and local incident commanders including, but not limited to, cave rescue, mine and tunnel rescue and vehicle/machinery extrication and swift water/flood teams. Such teams shall be aligned with one (1) or more of the categories within the federal emergency management agency’s national resource typing system.

“Idaho incident management and support teams (IIMAST)” means a type 3 incident management team, which is a multiagency/multijurisdiction team for extended incidents, formed and managed at the state, regional or metropolitan level deployed as a team of trained personnel to manage major and/or complex incidents requiring a significant number of local, regional and state resources and incidents that extend into multiple operational periods and require a written incident action plan (IAP) that may be utilized at all hazard type incidents. These teams may initially manage larger, more complex incidents prior to arrival of and transition to a type 2 or type 1 incident management team (IMT) under the direction of the agency having the jurisdiction.

“Person” shall have the definition ascribed to it in section 46-1021, Idaho Code.

§ 46-1027. Military division — Idaho office of emergency management — Additional powers and duties.

The military division through the Idaho office of emergency management shall implement the provisions of this section and section 46-1026, Idaho Code, and in so doing, the military division may:

Through the Idaho office of emergency management, in accordance with the laws of the state, hire, fix the compensation and prescribe the powers and duties of such other individuals including consultants, emergency teams and committees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and section 46-1026, Idaho Code.

Identify and implement ITR and specialty rescue teams that have appropriately trained personnel and necessary equipment to respond to technical rescue incidents and emergency disaster events. The military division shall enter into a written joint exercise of powers agreement with each entity or person providing equipment or services to a designated ITR or specialty rescue team. The teams shall be available and may respond to technical rescue incidents at the direction of the military division or its designee. When responding solely at the direction of the local incident commander, no cost recovery from the state of Idaho shall be available to ITR teams.

Identify and implement an Idaho incident management and support team (IIMAST) that has appropriately trained personnel to the type 3 level and necessary equipment to respond to all hazard incidents. The military division shall enter into a joint exercise of powers agreement with each entity or person providing equipment or services to a designated IIMAST member. The teams shall be available and may respond to all hazard incidents at the direction of the military division or its designee. When responding solely at the direction of the local incident commander, no cost recovery from the state of Idaho shall be available to IIMAST teams.

Contract with persons to meet state emergency response needs for the teams and response authorities.

Advise, consult and cooperate with agencies of the state and federal government, other states and their state agencies, cities, counties, tribal governments and other persons concerned with technical, rescue and all hazard incident disasters.

Encourage, participate in or conduct studies, investigations, training, research and demonstrations for and with Idaho technical rescue (ITR) teams, specialty rescue teams (SRT), Idaho incident management and support teams (IIMAST), local emergency response authorities and other interested persons.

Collect and disseminate information relating to emergency response to technical rescue related events and all hazards incident disasters.

Accept and administer loans, grants or other funds or gifts, conditional or otherwise, made to the state for emergency response activities provided for in this section and section 46-1026, Idaho Code.

Submit an annual report prior to February 1 to the governor and to the legislature concerning emergency response to technical rescue related events and disasters.

The military division through the Idaho office of emergency management shall have authority to promulgate rules and provide procedures to:

Govern reimbursement of claims pursuant to this section when a disaster has been declared pursuant to chapter 10, title 46, Idaho Code.

Provide for credentialing of Idaho technical rescue (ITR) teams, specialty rescue teams (SRT), and Idaho incident management and support teams (IIMAST) and for the identification and operation of all teams established pursuant to this section and section 46-1026, Idaho Code, and in accordance with the national incident management system, the national response framework and nationally recognized standards.

Establish a credentialing program to review and evaluate new and existing local and regional technical rescue capabilities and provide recommendations for capability enhancement in accordance with the national incident management system, the national response framework and nationally recognized standards.

Consistent with the provisions of subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the state of Idaho shall be liable for the acts or omissions of the Idaho technical rescue (ITR), specialty rescue teams (SRT) and Idaho incident management and support (IIMAST) teams responding to a technical rescue or all hazard incidents as a management team and the designating or requesting city or county shall be liable for the acts or omissions of a local emergency response authority responding to a technical rescue incident within its jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any Idaho technical rescue (ITR) team, speciality rescue team (SRT), Idaho incident management and support team (IIMAST), local emergency response authority or other person or group of persons who respond to a technical rescue incident or all hazard incidents as a management team at the request of an incident commander shall not be subject to civil liability for assistance or advice, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

The exemption from civil liability provided in this section shall not apply to an act or omission that caused, in whole or in part, such technical rescue or all hazard incident management response to a person who may otherwise be liable therefor or any person who has acted in a grossly negligent, reckless or intentional manner.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate the immunity granted to governmental entities pursuant to chapter 9, title 6, Idaho Code.